NodeJsProjects/SpellChecker/Dictionaries/nn_NO/nn_NO.aff
SFX G Y 37
SFX G   0     ne          e
SFX G   é     eene        é
SFX G   0     ene         [^eélmr]
SFX G   0     ene         [^e][lr]
SFX G   el    lene        [^dfkmnpstj]el
SFX G   0     ene         jel
SFX G   del   lene        ddel
SFX G   0     ene         [^d]del
SFX G   fel   lene        ffel
SFX G   kel   lene        kkel
SFX G   el    lene        [^k]kel
SFX G   mel   lene        mmel
SFX G   0     ene         [^m]mel
SFX G   0     ene         nel
SFX G   pel   lene        ppel
SFX G   el    lene        [^p]pel
SFX G   sel   lene        ssel
SFX G   el    lene        [^s]sel
SFX G   tel   lene        ttel
SFX G   el    lene        [^t]tel
SFX G   er    rene        [^fm]er
SFX G   fer   rene        fer
SFX G   mer   rene        mer
SFX G   0     ene         [^aeouø]m
SFX G   0     mene        [aø]m
SFX G   0     mene        jem
SFX G   0     mene        dlem
SFX G   0     ene         [bd]lem
SFX G   0     mene        [^kbd][lr]em
SFX G   0     ene         krem
SFX G   0     ene         [^jlr]em
SFX G   0     mene        [bdglr]om
SFX G   0     ene         [^s][bdgl]om
SFX G   0     ene         [^bdglr]om
SFX G   0     ene         [^eiks]um
SFX G   0     mene        [ks]um
SFX G   um    ene         [ei]um

SFX I Y 13
SFX I   0     e           er
SFX I   0     ne          er
SFX I   0     ne          [æø]r
SFX I   0     nes         [æø]r
SFX I   en    na          en
SFX I   e     ne          ye
SFX I   e     nene        ye
SFX I   ive   ev          ive
SFX I   ive   evet        ive
SFX I   ike   ek          ike
SFX I   ike   eket        ike
SFX I   0     et          um
SFX I   0     ets         um

SFX J Y 1
SFX J   0     s           [^s]

SFX K Y 1
SFX K   e     ast         e

SFX L Y 2
SFX L   0     ar          er
SFX L   0     ane         er

SFX M Y 19
SFX M   e     o           e
SFX M   ok    øker        ok
SFX M   ok    økene       ok
SFX M   or    ødrer       or
SFX M   or    ødrene      or
SFX M   aft   efter       aft
SFX M   aft   eftene      aft
SFX M   ot    øter        [bn]ot
SFX M   ot    øtene       [bn]ot
SFX M   ot    øtter       [fr]ot
SFX M   ot    øttene      [fr]ot
SFX M   ann   enn         ann
SFX M   ann   ennene      ann
SFX M   ang   enger       ang
SFX M   ang   engene      ang
SFX M   er    ene         er
SFX M   ar    ane         ar
SFX M   å     od          å
SFX M   a     ok          ta

SFX O Y 9
SFX O   e     te          [^t]e
SFX O   e     t           [^t]e
SFX O   0     a           atter
SFX O   atter øtre        atter
SFX O   atter øtrer       atter
SFX O   atter øtrene      atter
SFX O   a     og          a
SFX O   0     dd          a
SFX O   0     tt          a

SFX P Y 2
SFX P   0     dde         [aeiouyøå]
SFX P   0     dd          [aeiouyøå]

SFX Q Y 2
SFX Q   e     de          e
SFX Q   e     d           e

SFX R Y 4
SFX R   e     0           [^m]e
SFX R   e     0           [^m]me
SFX R   me    0           mme
SFX R   ere   ér          ere

SFX S Y 2
SFX S   e     ande        e
SFX S   0     ande        [aiouyæøå]

SFX T Y 3
SFX T   0     t           e
SFX T   0     te          e
SFX T   0     e           et

SFX U Y 11
SFX U   t     n           et
SFX U   et    ne          [^m]et
SFX U   met   ne          met
SFX U   ele   al          ele
SFX U   ele   ålet        ele
SFX U   øre   orde        ere
SFX U   øre   ort         ere
SFX U   egge  agt         egge
SFX U   egge  agte        egge
SFX U   um    a           um
SFX U   gi    av          gi

SFX V Y 14
SFX V   0     e           [^lmneo]
SFX V   0     e           [^e][ln]
SFX V   el    le          [^m]el
SFX V   fen   ne          fen
SFX V   mel   le          mel
SFX V   en    ne          [^fkls]en
SFX V   sen   ne          ssen
SFX V   en    ne          [^s]sen
SFX V   ken   ne          kken
SFX V   en    ne          [^k]ken
SFX V   len   ne          llen
SFX V   en    ne          [^l]len
SFX V   0     me          [aeiouø]m
SFX V   0     e           [^aeiouø]m

SFX W Y 13
SFX W   0     t           [^fklntiaøå]
SFX W   0     t           [^f]f
SFX W   f     t           ff
SFX W   0     t           [^k]k
SFX W   k     t           kk
SFX W   0     t           [^l]l
SFX W   0     t           ull
SFX W   l     t           [^u]ll
SFX W   0     t           [^n]n
SFX W   n     t           nn
SFX W   0     t           ei
SFX W   0     tt          [^e]i
SFX W   0     tt          [aøå]

SFX X Y 22
SFX X   0     are         [^e][^me]
SFX X   0     are         [eo][^lrnem]
SFX X   el    lare        el
SFX X   er    rare        er
SFX X   en    nare        en
SFX X   0     mare        [aou]m
SFX X   0     ast         [^e][^mge]
SFX X   0     aste        [^e][^mge]
SFX X   0     ast         [^e][oi][mge]
SFX X   0     aste        [^e][oi][mge]
SFX X   0     ast         e[oi][mge]
SFX X   0     aste        e[oi][mge]
SFX X   0     ast         e[^lrne]
SFX X   0     aste        e[^lrne]
SFX X   el    last        el
SFX X   el    laste       el
SFX X   er    rast        er
SFX X   er    raste       er
SFX X   en    nast        en
SFX X   en    naste       en
SFX X   0     mast        [au]m
SFX X   0     maste       [au]m

SFX Y Y 4
SFX Y   e     ingar       e
SFX Y   e     ingane      e
SFX Y   0     ingar       [aiouyøå]
SFX Y   0     ingane      [aiouyøå]

SFX Z N 5
SFX Z   0     elig        [^e]
SFX Z   0     elige       [^e]
SFX Z   e     bar         e
SFX Z   e     bart        e
SFX Z   e     bare        e

# SFX \[ N 2
# SFX \[   0     messig      .
# SFX \[   0     messige     .

# SFX \] N 2
# SFX \]   0     smessig     .
# SFX \]   0     smessige    .

# SFX \^ N 2
# SFX \^   0     aktig       .
# SFX \^   0     aktige      .

# SFX ~\\ N 1
# SFX ~\\   0     s           [^s]

# SFX ~\_ N 7
# SFX ~\_   e     ings        e
# SFX ~\_   0     e           [dgknprstuv]
# SFX ~\_   um    e           um
# SFX ~\_   0     e           [lr]m
# SFX ~\_   el    le          gel
# SFX ~\_   0     e           [^g]el
# SFX ~\_   0     e           [^e]l

# SFX ~\` N 2
# SFX ~\`   e     nings       e
# SFX ~\`   zyzyzy 0           zyzyzy
